Maryland, session 2025, SB0704.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) In this section, “artificial intelligence” means a machine–based system that:
(1) can, for a given set of human–defined objectives, make predictions,
recommendations, or decisions influencing real or virtual environments;
(2) uses machine and human–based inputs to perceive real and virtual
environments and abstracts those perceptions into models through analysis in an
automated manner; and
(3) uses model inference to formulate options for information or action.
(b) The State Department of Education shall conduct an evaluation of the use and
potential use of artificial intelligence in public schools.
(c) (1) In conducting its evaluation, the State Department of Education shall
create a survey for local school systems that assesses:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0704*

SENATE BILL 704
(i) whether the local school system has a policy for the use of
artificial intelligence by students, and if so, how the policy differs by student age, disability
status, and English language learning status;
(ii) whether the local school system has a policy for the use of
artificial intelligence as part of curricula, teaching materials, or lessons;
(iii) whether the local school system or any school within the school
system currently uses a system that makes use of artificial intelligence to assist with
student learning and, if so, which system is used and whether the system has been effective;
(iv) whether the local school system is adequately prepared for the
use of artificial intelligence, including whether the school system currently has in place:
1. sufficient technological infrastructure;
2. staff capacity to implement artificial intelligence systems
to assist with student learning; and
3. plans to address specific student needs using artificial
intelligence;
(v) the local school system’s identification and assessment of the
most commonly used artificial intelligence systems in education; and
(vi) how the State Department of Education could best assist the
local school system in its use of artificial intelligence to meet staff and student needs.
(2) On or before August 1, 2025, the State Department of Education shall
distribute the survey required under this subsection to each county board of education,
including Baltimore City.
(3) On or before October 1, 2025, each county board of education, including
Baltimore City, shall return a completed survey to the State Department of Education.
(d) (1) In addition to the survey required under subsection (c) of this section,
the State Department of Education’s evaluation shall include a review of available systems
that use artificial intelligence to:
(i) assist with student learning;
(ii) aid in the creation of curricula, lesson plans, and teaching
material;
(iii) help with the evaluation of student work; and

SENATE BILL 704 3
(iv) support administrators and educators in the administration of
schools.
(2) In completing its review of available artificial intelligence systems, the
State Department of Education shall analyze the pedagogical value of available artificial
intelligence systems and administrative aspects with which the artificial intelligence
systems are able to assist.
(3) (i) The Department of Information Technology shall assist the State
Department of Education in completing the review of artificial intelligence systems
required by this subsection.
(ii) The Department of Information Technology shall assist with the
review of artificial intelligence systems by evaluating the relative costs and benefits of:
1. the available artificial intelligence systems identified by
local school systems under subsection (c) of this section;
2. any additional available artificial intelligence systems
that meet the objectives listed under paragraph (1) of this subsection; and
3. the implementation of one or more statewide artificial
intelligence systems for use in public schools throughout the State, in accordance with the
policies and strategies developed by the Governor’s Artificial Intelligence Subcabinet of the
Governor’s Executive Council.
(e) (1) On or before January 1, 2026, the Department shall provide an interim
report on the results of the survey conducted under subsection (c) of this section to the
Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General
Assembly.
(2) On or before December 15, 2026, the Department shall issue a final
report on the results of its evaluation to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and 1 month and, at the end of June
30, 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.